Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF1031.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md H.F. 1031 Section 1. Section 331.601A, subsections 3 and 7, Code 2025, 1 are amended to read as follows: 2 3. âElectronic documentâ means a document or instrument 3 that is received, processed, disseminated, or maintained 4 in an electronic format. The submission of an electronic 5 document through the county land record information system 6 electronic submission service shall be equivalent to delivery 7 of a document through the United States postal service or 8 by personal delivery at designated offices in each county. 9 Persons who submit electronic documents for recording are 10 responsible for ensuring that the electronic documents comply 11 with all requirements for recording. 12 7. âPageâ means a writing, printing, or drawing, other than 13 a plat or survey or a drawing related to a plat or survey, 14 occurring on one side only and covering all or part of such 15 side, and not larger than eight and one-half inches in width 16 and fourteen inches in length. âPageâ also includes a plat 17 of survey, as defined in section 355.1, subsection 9, or a 18 drawing related to a plat of survey occurring on one side only 19 and covering all or part of such side, with a width of not 20 larger than twenty-four inches and a length of not larger than 21 thirty-six inches. 22 Sec. 2. Section 331.601A, Code 2025, is amended by adding 23 the following new subsections: 24 NEW SUBSECTION . 01. âAdditional parcel identifierâ means a 25 parcel letter or number designation approved by the auditor in 26 accordance with section 354.4, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , and 27 section 558.63. 28 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. âCounty land record management systemâ 29 means the physical or hosted system maintained or licensed 30 by each county for recording documents, assigning reference 31 numbers, specifying recording times, maintaining the database 32 and index of records, and archiving physical and electronic 33 documents providing recording services pursuant to subchapter 34 V, part 3, of this chapter and section 558.49. 35 -1- HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md 1/ 22 H.F. 1031 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. âElectronic services systemâ means the 1 organization formed under a chapter 28E agreement to provide 2 electronic and other services to counties and other public 3 agencies. 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 7A. âParcel identification numberâ means an 5 existing permanent real estate index number with related tax 6 maps as provided in section 441.29, subsection 2. 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 8A. âStatewide search website platform 8 or providerâ means the platform or provider approved by the 9 electronic services system to provide a statewide search 10 website for the purpose of viewing county public land records. 11 Sec. 3. Section 331.603, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 12 2025, is amended to read as follows: 13 a. The governing board of the county land record information 14 electronic services system statewide land record search website 15 platform or provider shall not enter into an agreement to 16 provide access to electronic documents or records on a batch 17 basis. The county recorder may collect reasonable fees for 18 access to electronic documents and records pursuant to an 19 agreement. The fees shall not exceed the actual cost of 20 providing access to the electronic documents and records. 21 âActual costâ means only those expenses directly attributable to 22 providing access to electronic documents and records. âActual 23 costâ shall not include costs such as employment benefits, 24 depreciation, maintenance, electricity, or insurance associated 25 with the administration of the office of the county recorder or 26 the county land record information electronic services system 27 statewide land record search website platform or provider . 28 Sec. 4. Section 331.603, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 29 following new subsection: 30 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. The electronic services system shall 31 issue a request for proposals in 2030, and then every five 32 years thereafter, for the purpose of exploring alternative 33 platforms and service providers for the statewide land record 34 search website in accordance with the following: 35 -2- HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md 2/ 22 H.F. 1031 a. The affirmative vote of at least sixty percent of the 1 counties participating in the chapter 28E agreement with the 2 electronic services system shall be obtained in order to 3 approve a change in the statewide search website platform or 4 provider. 5 b. The affirmative vote of at least eighty percent of 6 the counties participating in the chapter 28E agreement with 7 the electronic services system shall be obtained in order to 8 approve foregoing the request for proposals process. 9 c. Upon the affirmative vote of at least eighty percent of 10 the counties participating in the chapter 28E agreement with 11 the electronic services system, the electronic services system 12 shall issue a request for proposals prior to the date that 13 would otherwise be required by this subsection. 14 Sec. 5. Section 331.604, Code 2025, is amended to read as 15 follows: 16 331.604 Recording and filing fees. 17 1. Except as otherwise provided by state law, subsection 18 4 6 , or section 331.605 , the recorder shall collect a fee of 19 five ten dollars for each page or fraction of a page of an 20 instrument which that is filed or recorded in the recorderâs 21 office. If a page or fraction of a page contains more than 22 one transaction, the recorder shall collect the fee for each 23 transaction The maximum recording fee for documents with 24 twenty-five or more pages is two hundred fifty dollars . 25 2. a. The recorder shall also collect a fee of one dollar 26 for each recorded transaction for which a fee is paid pursuant 27 to subsection 1 to be used exclusively for the purpose of 28 preserving and maintaining public records From the total fee 29 for the recording of a document or instrument, two dollars 30 shall be deposited in a recorderâs technology advancement 31 fund created pursuant to this subsection . The treasurer, on 32 behalf of the recorder, shall establish and maintain a county 33 recorderâs records management technology advancement fund into 34 which all moneys collected pursuant to this subsection shall 35 -3- HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md 3/ 22 H.F. 1031 be deposited. Interest earned on moneys deposited in the fund 1 shall be credited to the county recorderâs records management 2 technology advancement fund. The recorder shall use the moneys 3 deposited in the fund to produce and maintain public records 4 that meet archival standards, and to enhance the technological 5 storage, retrieval, and transmission capabilities related 6 to archival quality records. The recorder may cooperate 7 collaborate with other entities, boards, and agencies to 8 establish methods of records management, and participate 9 in other joint ventures which further the purposes of this 10 subsection advance the use of technology for the delivery 11 of services consistent with standards established for those 12 services . 13 b. Fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall be used 14 to accomplish the following purposes: 15 (1) Preserve and maintain public records Maintaining and 16 improving equipment, software, and systems associated with 17 recording and other duties administered by the office of the 18 county recorder . 19 (2) Assist counties in reducing record preservation costs 20 Preserving and maintaining physical and electronic documents 21 and instruments archived by the county recorder . 22 (3) Encourage and foster maximum access to public records 23 maintained by county recorders at locations throughout the 24 state Converting physical documents to electronic documents 25 and providing that those documents are indexed as required 26 in sections 331.606 and 558.49. When converting physical 27 documents to electronic documents, if it is not feasible to 28 conform to standards for digitizing and indexing the documents 29 separately, then moneys may be used to digitize the records . 30 (4) Establish plans for anticipated and possible future 31 needs, including the handling and preservation of vital 32 statistics Participating in education and training for the 33 purpose of advancing technology and improving the services 34 provided by the office of the county recorder . 35 -4- HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md 4/ 22 H.F. 1031 c. The recorder shall make available any information 1 required by the county or state auditor concerning the 2 fees collected under this subsection 2 for the purposes of 3 determining the amount of fees collected and the uses for which 4 such fees are expended. 5 3. The treasurer, on behalf of the recorder, shall establish 6 and maintain a recorderâs electronic services system fund into 7 which all moneys collected pursuant to subsection 4 shall be 8 deposited. Interest earned on moneys deposited in the fund 9 shall be credited to the recorderâs electronic services system 10 fund. 11 4. a. From the total fee paid for the recording of a 12 document or instrument pursuant to subsection 1, for those 13 counties within the electronic services system bound by the 14 chapter 28E agreement, three dollars shall be transferred to 15 the recorderâs electronic services system fund. The recorderâs 16 electronic services system fund must be used for the purposes 17 outlined in section 331.605B, subsection 1. 18 b. By the first day of each month, the treasurer shall 19 transfer the moneys deposited into the recorderâs electronic 20 services system fund to an account in a financial institution 21 designated by the electronic services system. 22 5. a. Each county shall participate in the county land 23 record information system and shall comply with the policies 24 and procedures established by the governing board of the 25 county land record information system upload data and images 26 of recorded documents to the statewide search website. The 27 statewide search website platform or provider must allow for 28 uploading from each countyâs recording software provider or 29 link to a countyâs own search, if applicable . 30 b. (1) The recorder shall also collect a fee of one dollar 31 for each recorded transaction, regardless of the number of 32 pages, for which a fee is paid pursuant to subsection 1 A 33 recorder not participating in the chapter 28E agreement with 34 the electronic services system shall deposit into the county 35 -5- HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md 5/ 22 H.F. 1031 recorderâs electronic transaction fund established in paragraph 1 âcâ one dollar per document filed or recorded in the recorderâs 2 office to be used for the following purposes: 3 (a) Establishing and implementing standards for recording, 4 processing, and archiving electronic documents and records. 5 (b) Maintaining the purpose of maintaining a statewide 6 internet site and the county land record information system 7 dedicated to preserving and maintaining a statewide public 8 record search . 9 (c) Integrating information contained in documents and 10 records maintained by the recorder and other land record 11 information from other sources with the county land record 12 information system. 13 (d) Implementing and maintaining a process for redacting 14 personally identifiable information contained in electronic 15 documents that are displayed for public access through an 16 internet site or that are transferred to another person. 17 (2) The fee collected by the recorder under this subsection 18 for recording a plat of survey is one dollar, regardless of the 19 number of pages. For purposes of this subparagraph, âplat of 20 surveyâ means the same as defined in section 355.1, subsection 21 9 . 22 (3) Fees collected in excess of the amount needed for the 23 purposes specified in this subsection shall be used by the 24 county land record information system to reduce or eliminate 25 service fees for electronic submission of documents and 26 instruments. 27 c. The county treasurer, on behalf of the recorder, 28 shall establish and maintain a county recorderâs electronic 29 transaction fund into which all moneys collected pursuant to 30 paragraph âbâ shall be deposited. Interest earned on moneys 31 deposited in this fund shall be computed based on the average 32 monthly balance in the fund and shall be credited to the county 33 recorderâs electronic transaction fund. 34 d. The local government electronic transaction fund is 35 -6- HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md 6/ 22 H.F. 1031 established in the office of the treasurer of state under the 1 control of the treasurer of state. Moneys deposited into the 2 fund are not subject to section 8.33 . Notwithstanding section 3 12C.7 , interest or earnings on moneys in the local government 4 electronic transaction fund shall be credited to the fund. 5 Moneys in the local government electronic transaction fund 6 are not subject to transfer, appropriation, or reversion to 7 any other fund, or any other use except as provided in this 8 subsection . On a monthly basis, the county treasurer shall 9 pay the fees deposited into the county recorderâs electronic 10 transaction fund to the treasurer of state for deposit into 11 the local government electronic transaction fund. Moneys 12 credited to the local government electronic transaction fund 13 are appropriated to the treasurer of state for the payment 14 of claims approved by the governing board of the county land 15 record information system. Except as otherwise provided in 16 this subsection , expenditures from the county recorderâs 17 electronic transaction fund shall be for the purpose of 18 planning and implementing electronic recording and electronic 19 transactions in each county, developing county and statewide 20 internet sites to provide electronic access to records and 21 information, and to pay paying the ongoing costs of integrating 22 and maintaining the statewide internet site dedicated to 23 preserving and maintaining a statewide public record search . 24 e. The recorder shall make available any information 25 required by the county auditor or auditor of state concerning 26 the fees collected under this subsection for the purposes of 27 determining the amount of fees collected and the uses for which 28 such fees are expended. 29 f. The county land record information system agreement may 30 be amended by a vote of the boards of supervisors on behalf 31 of the respective county recorders, pursuant to the terms of 32 the agreement, to provide for the ongoing implementation of 33 the county land record information system. As used in this 34 paragraph, âcounty land record information system agreementâ 35 -7- HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md 7/ 22 H.F. 1031 means the agreement entered under chapter 28E between the 1 counties as required by 2005 Iowa Acts, ch. 179, Â§101 , as 2 amended by 2021 Iowa Acts, ch. 126 . 3 g. (1) Upon request by a peace officer, as defined in 4 section 801.4 , civilian employee of a law enforcement agency, 5 or state or federal judicial officer or state or federal 6 prosecutor, the county assessor or the county assessorâs staff, 7 or the county recorder or the county recorderâs staff, shall 8 redact the requestorâs name contained in electronic documents 9 that are displayed for public access through an internet site. 10 (2) Upon request by a former peace officer, as defined 11 in section 801.4 , or a former civilian employee of a law 12 enforcement agency, the county assessor or the county 13 assessorâs staff, or the county recorder or the county 14 recorderâs staff, may redact, upon the presentation of evidence 15 that a compelling safety interest is served by doing so, the 16 requestorâs name contained in electronic documents that are 17 displayed for public access through an internet site. 18 (3) This paragraph does not apply to a requestor holding or 19 seeking public office. 20 (4) The county assessor and the county recorder shall 21 implement and maintain a process to facilitate requests 22 pursuant to this paragraph. 23 (5) A fee shall not be charged for the administration of 24 this paragraph. 25 4. 6. A county shall not be required to pay a fee to the 26 recorder for filing or recording instruments. However, a 27 county treasurer is required to pay recording fees pursuant to 28 sections 437A.11 and 437B.7 . 29 Sec. 6. Section 331.605B, Code 2025, is amended by striking 30 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 31 331.605B Electronic services system. 32 1. The electronic services system shall develop, operate, 33 and maintain a county land record information system under a 34 chapter 28E agreement for the following purposes: 35 -8- HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md 8/ 22 H.F. 1031 a. Providing electronic filing services for recording 1 documents and instruments. 2 b. Providing shielding services to protect qualified 3 individuals as defined in section 331.606A, subsection 1. 4 c. Providing integration with other appropriate relational 5 property information systems. 6 d. Providing a system capable of notifying a user of 7 transactional activity associated with the userâs property, 8 name, or other public services. 9 e. Receiving authorized payments for services provided. 10 2. The governing board of the electronic services system 11 shall not collect a fee for viewing, accessing, or printing 12 documents in a county land record information system unless 13 specifically authorized by statute. The governing board may 14 collect a reasonable fee for using the system to process 15 electronic documents for recording. Fees collected for the 16 processing of electronic documents for recording may be used 17 for the purposes specified in subsection 1. 18 3. The electronic services systemâs chapter 28E agreement 19 may be amended by a vote of the boards of supervisors on behalf 20 of the respective county recorders pursuant to the terms of the 21 agreement. 22 4. The governing board of the electronic services system 23 is authorized to charge three dollars to submitters for an 24 electronic document submitted directly through the electronic 25 services system electronic submission service system. 26 5. The governing board of the electronic services system 27 shall not enter into an agreement to provide access to 28 electronic documents or records on a batch basis. 29 6. The electronic services system shall maintain an 30 alternative application programming interface that shall 31 enable a county to access an electronic document through the 32 electronic services system electronic submission service 33 system in a manner that will permit the county recorder to 34 review, decline, accept, and record a document through the 35 -9- HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md 9/ 22 H.F. 1031 county land record management system. The county recorder 1 shall return any required recording data and document images, 2 or information about the reason for declining a document 3 or changing a recording fee or exemption to the submission 4 service, through the electronic services system application 5 programming interface. Use of the interface will be at no cost 6 to the county, the county land record management system, or the 7 electronic services system. 8 7. Any county is authorized to withdraw from the chapter 28E 9 agreement with the electronic services system unconditionally 10 at any time, subject to the approval of the county board of 11 supervisors. A county that withdraws from the chapter 28E 12 agreement shall allow for the flow of electronic documents from 13 the electronic services system as described in subsection 6. 14 8. The electronic services system is a unit of local 15 government for purposes of chapter 670, relating to tort 16 liability of governmental subdivisions. 17 Sec. 7. Section 331.606, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2025, are 18 amended to read as follows: 19 1. In addition to other requirements specified by law, the 20 recorder shall note in the county system the date of filing of 21 each instrument, the number and character , the type or title of 22 the instrument, and the name of each grantor and grantee named 23 in the instrument. In numbering the When assigning reference 24 numbers to documents or instruments, the recorder may shall 25 start with the number one immediately following the date of 26 annual settlement with the board and continue to number them 27 consecutively until the next annual settlement with the board 28 or the recorder may start with number one on the first working 29 day of the calendar year and continue to number the instruments 30 consecutively on the first working day of the calendar year and 31 continue to number the instruments consecutively until the last 32 working day of the calendar year. 33 2. The recorder shall also note in the index the exact 34 time of the filing recording of each document or instrument. 35 -10- HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md 10/ 22 H.F. 1031 Associated recording references, if on the document, shall be 1 indexed with the recorded document. A parcel identification 2 number shall be referenced if on the document and shall not be 3 modified unless the modification is necessary to correct an 4 error. 5 Sec. 8. Section 331.606A, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 6 amended by adding the following new paragraphs: 7 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0a. âEligible professionalâ means any of the 8 following: 9 (1) A participating attorney, abstractor, closer, or 10 associated personnel authorized to provide services on behalf 11 of Iowa title guaranty. 12 (2) An attorney licensed to practice in Iowa. 13 (3) A representative of a financial institution as defined 14 in section 527.2. 15 (4) A representative of an insurer or an insurance support 16 organization. 17 (5) A representative of a commercial entity using personal 18 information to do any of the following: 19 (a) Prevent, detect, protect against, or respond to 20 security incidents, identity theft, fraud, harassment, 21 malicious or deceptive activities, or any other illegal 22 activity. 23 (b) Preserve the integrity or security of a county land 24 record management system. 25 (c) Investigate, report, or assist in the prosecution of a 26 person responsible for an action or circumstance described in 27 subparagraph division (a) or (b). 28 NEW PARAGRAPH . 00a. âInformation shieldingâ means 29 restricting access to a document or information associated with 30 a qualified individual that is posted through a public internet 31 site. 32 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0c. (1) âQualified individualâ means any 33 of the following: 34 (a) A peace officer as defined in section 801.4, civilian 35 -11- HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md 11/ 22 H.F. 1031 employee of a law enforcement agency, or state or federal 1 judicial officer or state or federal prosecutor, or a spouse or 2 child of such a person. 3 (b) A former peace officer, as defined in section 801.4, 4 or a former civilian employee of a law enforcement agency who 5 presents evidence of a compelling safety interest, or a spouse 6 or child of such a person. 7 (c) A victim of domestic abuse, domestic abuse assault, 8 sexual abuse, assault, stalking, or human trafficking as 9 evidenced by the filing of a petition pursuant to section 236.3 10 or a criminal complaint or information pursuant to section 11 708.1, 708.2A, 708.11, or 710A.2, or any violation contained 12 in chapter 709. 13 (d) A program participant as defined in section 9E.2. 14 (2) Notwithstanding the meanings described in subparagraph 15 (1), subparagraph division (a), a person holding or seeking 16 public office is not a qualified individual. 17 Sec. 9. Section 331.606A, subsections 3 and 4, Code 2025, 18 are amended to read as follows: 19 3. Redaction of personally identifiable information from 20 electronic documents. Personally identifiable information 21 that is contained in electronic documents that are displayed 22 for public access on an internet site, or which that are 23 transferred to any person, shall be redacted prior to 24 displaying or transferring the documents. Each recorder that 25 displays electronic documents and the county land record 26 information system statewide search website that displays 27 electronic documents on behalf of a county shall implement 28 a system for redacting personally identifiable information. 29 The recorder and the governing board of the county land 30 record information system shall establish a procedure by 31 which individuals may request that personally identifiable 32 information contained in an electronic document displayed on 33 an internet site be redacted, at no fee to the requesting 34 individual. The requirements of this subsection shall be fully 35 -12- HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md 12/ 22 H.F. 1031 implemented not later than December 31, 2011. 1 4. Dissemination of documents. Persons who have contracted 2 with a county recorder or the governing board of the 3 county land record information system to redact personally 4 identifiable information from electronic documents pursuant to 5 subsection 3 shall not sell, transfer, or otherwise disseminate 6 the electronic documents in an unaltered or redacted form, 7 except as provided for in the contract. 8 Sec. 10. Section 331.606A, subsection 7, Code 2025, is 9 amended by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu 10 thereof the following: 11 7. Information shielding of documents. 12 a. Upon request by a qualified individual, the county 13 assessor or the county assessorâs staff, or the county recorder 14 or the county recorderâs staff, shall implement an information 15 shielding process to restrict public access to electronic 16 documents or internet pages that contain information about 17 the qualified individual. The county assessor and the county 18 recorder shall implement a process without charging a fee to 19 facilitate requests pursuant to this subsection. 20 b. Information shielding processes shall include provisions 21 that would permit eligible professionals to access shielded 22 information. Access to shielded information may also be 23 granted to other professionals with the written permission of 24 the qualified individual. Eligible professionals and others 25 who are granted access to shielded information must agree to 26 maintain the confidentiality of the qualified individual. 27 Upon request, the county recorder shall provide access to the 28 shielded information electronically. An eligible professional 29 shall be authorized to disclose any shielded information 30 when such disclosure is necessary to advance a legitimate 31 business purpose including but not limited to the provision of 32 services related to a real estate transaction. A fee shall 33 not be charged to an eligible professional requesting shielded 34 information. 35 -13- HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md 13/ 22 H.F. 1031 Sec. 11. Section 331.606B, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 331.606B Document or document formatting standards. 3 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7 , the county 4 recorder shall refuse any document or instrument presented 5 for recording To ensure that recorded documents are legible 6 and contain all required information in order to facilitate a 7 permanent record that can be properly archived and indexed, a 8 recorder may decline to record a document or instrument that 9 does not meet the following requirements: 10 a. Each document or instrument shall consist of one or more 11 individual pages not permanently bound or in a continuous form. 12 The For purposes of this paragraph, âcontinuous formâ means 13 individual one-sided pages. A physical document or instrument 14 presented for recording shall not be permanently bound, have 15 any attachment stapled , taped or otherwise affixed to any page 16 except as necessary to comply with statutory requirements , and 17 must contain text or graphics on only one side . However, the 18 The individual pages of a physical document or instrument may 19 be stapled clipped together for presentation for recording. 20 A physical document or instrument containing a label that 21 is firmly attached with a bar code or return address may be 22 accepted for recording. 23 b. All preprinted text shall must be legible and the font 24 at least eight ten point in size and no more than twenty 25 characters and spaces per inch , except that the font may be 26 eight point in size if the document is a plat or survey . All 27 other text typed or computer generated, including but not 28 limited to all names of parties to an agreement, shall be at 29 least ten point in size and no more than sixteen characters 30 and spaces per inch. If a document or instrument, other than 31 a plat or survey or a drawing related to a plat or survey, 32 presented for recording contains type smaller than eight point 33 type for the preprinted text and ten point type for all other 34 text, the document or instrument shall be accompanied by an 35 -14- HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md 14/ 22 H.F. 1031 exact typewritten or printed copy that meets the requirements 1 of this section . 2 c. Each document shall be of sufficient legibility to 3 produce a clear reproduction. If a A document or instrument, 4 other than a plat or survey or a drawing related to a plat or 5 survey, that is not fully or partially sufficiently legible to 6 produce a clear reproduction , the document or instrument shall 7 be accompanied by an exact typewritten or printed copy that 8 meets the type size requirements of paragraph âbâ and shall 9 a legible copy of the full or partial page, which shall be 10 recorded contemporaneously as additional pages of the document 11 or instrument. 12 d. Each A physical document or instrument , other than a plat 13 or survey or a drawing related to a plat or survey, shall must 14 be on standard white paper of not less than twenty-pound weight 15 without watermarks or other visible inclusions markings . All 16 text within the document or instrument shall be of sufficient 17 color and clarity to ensure that the text is readable when 18 reproduced from the record. 19 e. All signatures on a document or instrument shall be in 20 black or dark blue ink and of sufficient color and clarity to 21 ensure that the signatures are readable discernible when the 22 document or instrument is reproduced from the record. The 23 corresponding name shall must be typed, printed , or stamped 24 beneath the original signature. The typing or printing of a 25 name or the application of an embossed or inked stamp shall 26 not cover or otherwise materially interfere with any part 27 of the document or instrument except where when provided by 28 law. Failure to print or type signatures as provided in this 29 paragraph does not invalidate the document or instrument. 30 f. The first page of each document or instrument, other than 31 a plat or survey or a drawing related to a plat or survey, shall 32 have a top margin of at least three inches of vertical space 33 from left to right which shall be reserved one-half of one 34 inch. If the document or instrument does not include a cover 35 -15- HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md 15/ 22 H.F. 1031 page, then there must be a blank rectangular space with the 1 dimensions of three and three-fourths inches in width and two 2 and one-half inches in height adjacent to the top margin on the 3 first page and designated for the recorderâs use. All other 4 margins on the document or instrument shall be a minimum of 5 three-fourths of one inch. Nonessential information including 6 but not limited to form numbers, page numbers, or customer 7 notations may be placed in a margin except the top margin. The 8 recorder shall not incur any liability for not showing a seal 9 or information that extends beyond the margin of the permanent 10 archival record. 11 g. Each A document or instrument presented for recording 12 shall meet the requirements of section 331.606A, subsection 2 13 not include personally identifiable information unless redacted 14 in accordance with section 331.606A, subsection 3 . 15 2. Each document or instrument, other than a plat or survey 16 or a drawing related to a plat or survey, that is presented for 17 recording shall contain the following information on the first 18 page below the three-inch margin or on a cover page : 19 a. The name, address, and either the telephone number or 20 email address of the individual who prepared the document , or 21 the contact information for an individual who is familiar with 22 the document or instrument and is able to address questions 23 from the recorderâs office . 24 b. For any instrument of conveyance, the name of the 25 taxpayer and a complete mailing address. 26 c. A return address. 27 d. The type or title of the document or instrument. 28 e. All grantorsâ names. 29 f. All granteesâ names. 30 g. Any address required by statute. 31 h. The legal description of the property and parcel 32 identification number, if required. 33 i. A document or instrument number for statutory 34 requirements Associated recording references , if applicable. 35 -16- HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md 16/ 22 H.F. 1031 3. A cover page meeting the requirements of subsection 1 1 may be included with the document or instrument and shall 2 be recorded contemporaneously as an additional page of the 3 document or instrument. If insufficient space exists on 4 the first page or the cover page for all of the information 5 described in subsection 2 , the person presenting the document 6 for recording must identify on the first page or the cover page 7 a page reference of for the document or instrument where the 8 required information is located shall be noted on the first 9 page can be located . 10 4. a. Each document or certificate prepared by a licensed 11 professional land surveyor and presented for recording, 12 including a plat of survey or a drawing related to a plat 13 of survey, shall contain an index legend. However, this 14 requirement shall not apply to a United States public land 15 survey corner certificate described in section 355.11 . 16 b. Each document or certificate prepared by a licensed 17 professional land surveyor and presented for recording, 18 including a plat of survey or a drawing related to a plat 19 of survey, shall include a blank rectangular space three and 20 three-fourth inches in width and two and one-half inches in 21 height reserved and delineated for the county recorderâs use, 22 unless the document is attached to a cover sheet approved by 23 the governing board of the county land record information 24 system. 25 5. 4. The recorder may record the following documents or 26 instruments , which are exempt from the format requirements of 27 this section : 28 a. A document or instrument that was signed before July 1, 29 2005. 30 b. A military separation document or instrument. 31 c. A document or instrument executed outside the United 32 States. 33 d. A certified copy of a document or instrument issued by a 34 governmental agency, including a vital record. 35 -17- HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md 17/ 22 H.F. 1031 e. A document or instrument where when one of the original 1 parties is deceased or otherwise incapacitated. 2 f. A document or instrument formatted to meet court 3 requirements. 4 g. A federal tax lien. 5 h. A filing under the uniform commercial code, chapter 554 . 6 i. A groundwater hazard statement pursuant to section 7 558.69 . 8 6. 5. A physical document or instrument rejected declined 9 for recording by a recorder shall be returned to the preparer 10 or presenter accompanied by an explanation of the reason 11 for rejection declining the document or instrument and any 12 information necessary to correct the defect. A person who 13 files an electronic document or instrument declined for 14 recording by a recorder shall be notified by the recorder that 15 the document or instrument has been declined, the reason the 16 document or instrument has been declined, and any information 17 necessary to correct the defect. If the recording fee for an 18 electronic document or instrument was calculated and processed 19 incorrectly, the person who filed the document or instrument 20 shall be notified of the error and the reason for the fee 21 adjustment by the recorderâs office . 22 7. a. On and after July 1, 2005, a document or instrument 23 that does not conform to the format standards specified in 24 subsections 1 through 3 shall not be accepted for recording 25 except upon payment of an additional recording fee of ten 26 dollars per document or instrument. The requirement applies 27 only to documents or instruments dated on or after July 1, 28 2005, and does not apply to those documents or instruments 29 specifically exempted in subsection 5 . 30 b. On and after July 1, 2009, a document or instrument 31 that does not conform to the format standards specified in 32 subsection 1 , paragraphs âcâ and âeâ , or subsection 2 , paragraph 33 âbâ , shall not be accepted for recording. This paragraph 34 applies only to documents or instruments dated on or after July 35 -18- HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md 18/ 22 H.F. 1031 1, 2009, and does not apply to those documents or instruments 1 specifically exempted in subsection 5 . 2 Sec. 12. NEW SECTION . 331.612 Recording of surveys. 3 1. Notwithstanding section 331.606B, the following 4 document or document formatting standards shall apply to 5 surveys submitted by licensed professional land surveyors for 6 recording: 7 a. All text must be legible and the font at least eight 8 point in size. 9 b. All text font, signatures, and drawings must have 10 sufficient weight, contrast, and darkness to produce a clear 11 reproduction. 12 c. Physical documents submitted to a county for recording 13 shall be on standard white paper without watermarks or other 14 visible markings and shall have dimensions no greater than 15 eleven by seventeen inches. Notwithstanding the dimensions 16 specified for physical documents in this paragraph, a physical 17 document with dimensions no greater than twenty-four inches 18 by thirty-six inches may be submitted to the county if the 19 county recorder is able to scan or digitize the document while 20 maintaining the original scale and quality of the document 21 as specified in paragraphs âaâ and âbâ . Electronic documents 22 submitted to a county for recording shall have dimensions no 23 greater than twenty-four inches by thirty-six inches. 24 d. The survey must contain an index legend as outlined in 25 subsection 2. 26 e. A survey must provide a cover page or a blank rectangular 27 space on the first page with the dimensions of three and 28 three-fourths inches in width and two and one-half inches in 29 height designated for the recorderâs use. 30 2. A survey must contain an index legend consisting of a 31 compact table or a grid with lines that provides the following 32 information: 33 a. The county name. 34 b. For platted land, the index information shall include 35 -19- HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md 19/ 22 H.F. 1031 the additional parcel identifier, if applicable; lot or unit; 1 block; unabbreviated subdivision name; town, city, or county; 2 section; township; and range. For unplatted land, the indexed 3 information shall include the additional parcel identifier, 4 if applicable, section, township, range, and quarter section. 5 Indexing quarters of a quarter section is recommended but 6 not required. Subdivision plats, acquisition plats, and 7 retracement plats of survey shall reference the existing 8 auditorâs parcel designation in accordance with section 354.4, 9 subsection 1, paragraph âaâ . A plat of survey shall reference 10 the approved auditorâs parcel designation in accordance with 11 section 354.4, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ . 12 c. The parcel identification number and additional parcel 13 identifier, if applicable. 14 d. The proprietorâs name. 15 e. The requestorâs name. 16 f. Associated reference numbers for previously recorded 17 surveys. 18 g. The surveyorâs name, address, and phone number or email 19 address. 20 h. Information necessary for the county recorder to return 21 the survey document. 22 i. If the survey document is a monument preservation 23 certificate, the name of the government entity requesting the 24 certification in accordance with section 355.6A. 25 Sec. 13. Section 354.18, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 26 to read as follows: 27 2. The recorder shall examine each plat of survey and 28 subdivision plat to determine whether the plat is clearly 29 legible and whether the approval by the applicable governing 30 body and the other attachments required by this chapter are 31 presented with the plat. The recorder shall also keep a 32 reproducible physical or electronic copy of the plat from 33 which legible copies can be made. The When a physical plat is 34 presented for recording, the recorder may specify the material 35 -20- HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md 20/ 22 H.F. 1031 and the size of the plat , accepted for recording as long as 1 the document is not less than eight and one-half inches in 2 width by eleven inches , that will be accepted for recording in 3 order to comply with this section in height . The recorder must 4 accept an electronically submitted plat or subdivision plat 5 meeting the requirements of section 355.7, 355.7A, or 355.8, 6 respectively. The recorder shall not record a subdivision plat 7 that violates this chapter . 8 Sec. 14. Section 355.6A, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 9 to read as follows: 10 4. a. The monument preservation certificate shall be 11 filed with the county recorder pursuant to section 331.606B, 12 subsection 5 331.612, subsection 2, paragraph âiâ , no later than 13 thirty days after the certificate is signed by the surveyor. 14 b. The county recorder shall index the monument preservation 15 certificate according to the township, range, section number, 16 and quarter section on in which the monument is located within . 17 If the monument is located within an official plat, the county 18 recorder shall also index the certificate alphabetically by the 19 official plat name. 20 c. The index legend affixed to such certificate shall 21 include the following information: 22 (1) The surveyorâs name, mailing address, and other contact 23 information. 24 (2) The name of the governmental entity or other 25 organization under which the surveyor provided the professional 26 service. 27 (3) The aliquot part or parts of the United States public 28 land survey system or portion of official plat that the 29 monument is located within. 30 (4) The name of the governmental entity or other 31 organization requesting the monument preservation certificate 32 pursuant to this section . 33 (5) Information necessary for the county recorder to return 34 the certificate. 35 -21- HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md 21/ 22 H.F. 1031 Sec. 15. Section 355.12, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 355.12 Indexing of survey documents by recorder. 3 The recorder shall index survey documents and United States 4 public land corner certificates submitted in accordance with 5 section 331.612, subsection 2, paragraph âbâ , by township, 6 range, and section number. If the survey is in a recorded 7 subdivision, the recorder shall also index the document 8 alphabetically by subdivision name. 9 Sec. 16. 2005 Acts, chapter 179, section 101, subsection 10 1, as amended by 2021 Iowa Acts, chapter 126, section 2, is 11 amended to read as follows: 12 1. The board of supervisors of each county, on behalf of 13 each county recorder, shall may execute a chapter 28E agreement 14 with the other counties electronic services system for the 15 implementation of the county land record information system. 16 Sec. 17. TRANSITION. Any moneys remaining in each county 17 recorderâs records management fund, as described in section 18 331.604, subsection 2, paragraph âaâ, Code 2025, as of 19 the effective date of this Act shall be transferred to the 20 respective countyâs recorderâs technology advancement fund, as 21 described in section 331.604, subsection 2, as amended by this 22 Act. Any moneys remaining in the local government electronic 23 transaction fund, as described in section 331.604, subsection 24 3, paragraph âdâ, Code 2025, after the effective date of this 25 Act are appropriated to the treasurer of state to be used by 26 the treasurer of state to assist the governing board of the 27 electronic services system in accomplishing the purposes stated 28 in section 331.605B, subsection 1, as amended by this Act. 29 -22- HF 1031 (3) 91 js/jh/md 22/ 22